Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-148
Amendment of recorded lien.

(1) A recorded lien may be amended by an additional recording at any time during the period allowed for recording the original lien. An amendment adding real estate or increasing the amount of lien claimed is effective as to the additional real estate or increased amount only from the time the amendment is recorded.

(2) A recorded lien may be amended after the period allowed for recording the original lien for the purpose of:

(a) Reducing the amount of the lien;

(b) Reducing the real estate against which the lien is claimed; or

(c) Making an apportionment of the lien among lots of a platted subdivision of record.

(3) An amendment shall state the record location and date of recording of the notice of lien being amended and shall state the respects in which it is being amended.

Laws 1981, LB 512, § 24.